District of Columbia statutes.
36-407

Effect on other law.

(a)

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, this chapter supersedes conflicting tort, restitution and other law of the District of Columbia providing civil remedies for misappropriation of a trade secret.

(b)

This chapter does not affect:

(1)

Contractual remedies, whether or not based upon misappropriation of a trade secret;

(2)

Other civil remedies that are not based upon misappropriation of a trade secret; or

(3)

Criminal remedies, whether or not based upon misappropriation of a trade secret.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-216, § 8, 36 DCR 519
1981 Ed., § 48-507.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 7 of the Uniform Trade Secrets Act.